it: Layout della pagina: Alfabetico; Vuoto; A schede; Altro
pl: Układ strony: Alfabetycznie; Puste; Z zakładkami; Inne
fr: Disposition de la page: Alphabétique; Vide; À onglets; Autre
bg-BG: Оформление на страницата: По азбучен ред; Празна страница; С раздели; Други
cs: Rozložení stránky: Abecední; Prázdný; Se záložkami; Jiné
sl-SI: Postavitev strani: Abecedno; Prazno; Zavihki; Drugo
ro-RO: Aspectul paginii: Alfabetic; Goală; Cu file; Altele
de: Seitenlayout: Alphabetisch; Leer; Tabelliert; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 页面布局: 按字母顺序; 空白; 选项卡式; 其他
pt-PT: Esquema de página: Alfabético; Em branco; Com separadores; Outro
ru: Макет страницы: По алфавиту; Пустой; С вкладками; Другой
ja: ページレイアウト: アルファベット順; 空白; タブ付き; その他
pt-BR: Layout da página: Alfabético; Em branco; Com abas; Outro
nl: Paginaopmaak: Alfabetisch; Blanco; Met tabbladen; Andere
vi: Bố cục trang: Theo bảng chữ cái; Trống rỗng; Phân thẻ; Khác
ko: 페이지 레이아웃: 알파벳순; 공백; 탭으로 구분; 기타
zh-TW: 頁面版面配置: 按字母順序; 空白; 選項卡式; 其他
nb: Sideoppsett: Alfabetisk; Tom; Faner; Annet
sv: Sidlayout: Alfabetisk; Tom; Med flikar; Övrigt
es: Diseño de página: Alfabético; En blanco; Con pestañas; Otros
hr-HR: Izgled stranice: Abecedno; Prazno; S karticama; Ostalo
fi: Sivuasettelu: Aakkosellinen; Tyhjä; Välilehdellinen; Muu
da: Sidelayout: Alfabetisk; Blank; Med faner; Andet
tr: Sayfa Düzeni: Alfabetik; Boş; Sekmeli; Diğer
el: Διάταξη σελίδας: Αλφαβητική; Κενή; Με καρτέλες; Άλλο
lt-LT: Puslapio išdėstymas: Abėcėlinis; Tuščias; Su skirtukais; Kita
th: เลย์เอาต์หน้า: ตัวอักษร; ว่างเปล่า; ทำแท็บแล้ว; อื่นๆ
hu: Oldalelrendezés: Betűrendes; Üres; Lapos; Egyéb
sk-SK: Rozloženie stránky: Abecedný; Prázdny; So záložkou; Iné
en: Page layout: Alphabetical; Blank; Tabbed; Other